Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-627
License requirements;
fees; renewal; premises available for inspection.

(1)
A person shall not operate as a commercial breeder, a dealer, a boarding kennel,
an animal control facility, an
animal shelter, or, beginning
October 1, 2010, an animal rescue unless the person obtains the
appropriate license as a commercial breeder, a dealer, a boarding
kennel, an animal
control facility, an animal shelter, or, beginning October 1, 2010, an animal
rescue. If a licensee is operating as an animal shelter as of July 15, 2010,
he or she may apply for licensure as an animal rescue before October 1, 2010,
and shall not be required to pay any licensing fee until October 1, 2010.
A person shall not operate as a pet shop unless the person obtains a license
as a pet shop. A pet shop shall only be subject to the Commercial Dog and
Cat Operator Inspection Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant thereto in any area or areas of the establishment used for the keeping
and selling of pet animals. If a facility listed in this subsection is not
located at the owner's residence, the name and address of the owner shall
be posted on the premises.

(2) An applicant for a license shall submit an application
for the appropriate license to the department, on a form prescribed by the
department, together with the annual license fee. Such fee is nonreturnable.
Upon receipt of the application and annual license fee and upon completion
of a qualifying inspection if required pursuant to section 54-630 for an initial
license applicant or if a qualifying inspection is deemed appropriate by the
department before a license is issued for any other applicant, the appropriate
license may be issued by the department. Such license shall not be transferable
to another person or location.

(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
annual license fee shall be determined according to the following fee schedule
based upon the daily average number of dogs or cats housed by the licensee
over the previous annual licensure period:

(i) Ten or fewer dogs or cats, one hundred fifty dollars;

(ii) Eleven to fifty dogs or cats, two hundred dollars;

(iii) Fifty-one to one
hundred dogs or cats, two hundred fifty dollars;

(iv) One hundred one to one hundred
fifty dogs or cats, three hundred dollars;

(v) One hundred fifty-one to two hundred dogs or cats,
three hundred fifty dollars;

(vi) Two hundred one to two hundred fifty dogs or
cats, four hundred dollars;

(vii) Two hundred fifty-one to three hundred dogs
or cats, four hundred fifty dollars;

(viii) Three hundred one to three hundred fifty dogs
or cats, five hundred dollars;

(ix) Three hundred fifty-one to four hundred dogs
or cats, five hundred fifty dollars;

(x) Four hundred one to four hundred fifty dogs or
cats, six hundred dollars;

(xi) Four hundred fifty-one to five hundred dogs or
cats, six hundred fifty dollars; and

(xii) More than five
hundred dogs or cats, two
thousand dollars.

(b) The initial license fee for any person required to be
licensed pursuant to the act shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars.

(c) The annual license fee for a licensee that does not house
dogs or cats shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

(d) The annual
license fee for an animal rescue shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

(e) The fees charged under
this subsection may be increased or decreased by the director after a public
hearing is held outlining the reason for any proposed change in the fee. The maximum fee that may be charged shall
not result in a fee for any license category that exceeds the license fee
set forth in this subsection by more than one hundred dollars.

(4) A license to operate as a commercial breeder, a license
to operate as a dealer, a license to operate as a boarding kennel, or a license
to operate as a pet shop shall be renewed by filing with the department on or before April 1 of each
year a renewal application and the annual license fee. A license to operate
as an animal control facility,
animal rescue, or animal shelter shall be renewed by filing with
the department on
or before October 1 of each year a renewal application and the
annual license fee. Failure to renew a license prior to the expiration of
the license shall result in a late renewal fee equal to twenty percent
of the annual license fee due and payable each month, not to exceed one hundred
percent of such fee, in addition to the license fee. The purpose of the late
renewal fee is to pay for the administrative costs associated with the collection
of fees under this section. The assessment of the late renewal fee shall not
prohibit the director from taking any other action as provided in the act.

(5) A licensee under this section shall make its premises
available for inspection pursuant to section 54-628 during normal business
hours.

(6) The state or any political subdivision of the state which
contracts out its animal control duties to a facility not operated by the
state or any political subdivision of the state may be exempted from the licensing
requirements of this section if such facility is licensed as an animal control
facility, animal rescue, or
animal shelter for the full term of the contract with the state or its political
subdivision.

(7) Any fees
collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
for credit to the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Program Cash
Fund.

Laws 2000, LB 825, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 233, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 274, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 1002, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB12, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB241, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB910, § 6.